Utah statutes.
65A-1-4.   Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands -- Creation -- Power
and authority.
(1) (a)  The Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands is created within the
Department of Natural Resources under the administration and general
supervision of the executive director of the department.
(b)  The division is the executive authority for the management of sovereign
lands, and the state's mineral estates on lands other than school and
institutional trust lands, and shall provide for forestry and fire control
activities as required in Section 65A-8-101.
(2)  The division shall adopt rules under Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, necessary to fulfill the purposes of this
title.
(3)  The director of the Division of Forestry, Fire, and State Lands is the
executive and administrative head of the division and shall be a person
experienced in administration and management of natural resources.
(4)  The director shall inform the council:
(a)  in an annual meeting of the division's plans, policies, and budget; and
(b)  of policy changes and developing conflicts.
(5)  The director shall give the council an opportunity to advise on the
changes and conflicts.
(6) (a)  An aggrieved party to a final action by the director may appeal that
action to the executive director of the Department of Natural Resources within
20 days after the action.
(b)  The executive director shall rule on the director's action within 20 days
after receipt of the appeal.
